Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska15-220
Dogs and other animals; licensing; regulation.

A city of the primary class shall have the power to regulate, license, or prohibit the running at large of dogs and other animals and guard against injuries or annoyances from such animals and to authorize the destruction of such animals when running at large contrary to the provisions of any ordinance. Any licensing provision shall comply with subsection (2) of section 54-603 for service animals.

Laws 1901, c. 16, § 129, XXIV, p. 133;

R.S.1913, § 4434;

C.S.1922, § 3818;

C.S.1929, § 15-221;

R.S.1943, § 15-220;

Laws 1981, LB 501, § 2;

Laws 1997, LB 814, § 3;

Laws 2008, LB806, § 2;

Laws 2020, LB1003, § 37.

For other provisions for regulation of dogs and cats, see sections 15-218, 54-601 to 54-624, and 71-4401 to 71-4412.